District of Columbia statutes.
15-521

Notice of claim or exemption; trial.

When personal property taken on execution or other process issued by the Superior Court of the District of Columbia is claimed by a person other than the defendant therein, or is claimed by the defendant to be property exempt from execution, and the claimant gives written notice to the marshal of his claim, or the defendant gives notice, in writing, that the property is exempt, the marshal shall notify the plaintiff of the claim and return the notice to the court, and a trial of the right of property, or the question of exemption, shall be had before the court.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 530, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 553, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 144(8)(A)(i)
1973 Ed., § 15-521.
1981 Ed., § 15-521.
This section is referenced in § 15-522 and § 15-523.